Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2240
Complaints;
hearing; decision; order; appeal.

(1) The administrative
hearing on the allegations in the complaint filed pursuant to section 76-2239
shall be heard by a hearing officer at the time
and place prescribed by the board and in accordance with the Administrative
Procedure Act. If, at the conclusion of the hearing, the hearing
officer determines that the credential holder is guilty of the
violation, the board shall take such
disciplinary action as the board deems appropriate.
Disciplinary actions which may be taken shall include, but not be limited
to, revocation, suspension, probation, admonishment, letter of reprimand,
and formal censure, with publication, of the credential holder and may or may not
include an education requirement. Costs incurred for an administrative hearing,
including fees of counsel, the
hearing officer, court reporters, investigators, and witnesses,
shall be taxed as costs in such action as the board may direct.

(2) The decision and order of the board shall be final. Any
decision or order of the board may be appealed. The appeal shall be on questions
of law only and otherwise shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure
Act.

Laws 1990, LB 1153, § 40;

Laws 1991, LB 203, § 44;

Laws 1994, LB 1107, § 41;

Laws 2001, LB 162, § 32;

Laws 2010, LB931, § 22.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.